Utah statutes.
40-10-6.5.   Rulemaking authority and procedure.

(1)  The board shall promulgate rules under this chapter in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), no rule which the board adopts for the purpose of the state administering a program under the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act may be more stringent than the corresponding federal regulations which address the same circumstances.  In adopting such rules, the board may incorporate by reference corresponding federal regulations.

(3)  The board may adopt rules more stringent than corresponding federal regulations for the purpose described in Subsection (2), only if it makes a written finding after public comment and hearing, and based on evidence in the record, that the corresponding federal regulation is not adequate to protect public safety and the environment of the state. Those findings shall be accompanied by an opinion referring to and evaluating the public safety and environmental information and studies contained in the record which form the basis for the board's conclusion.

